New York, session 2025-2026, S4368.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5-a of section 402 of the public housing law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph g to read as follows: 3 g. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in this 4 chapter, or any general, special or local law, the city of New York 5 housing authority shall have the power to provide and maintain on site 6 superintendents and maintenance supervisors at all city of New York 7 housing authority facilities. Such site superintendent or maintenance 8 supervisor shall have the duty, in and about housing facilities, to 9 preserve the cleanliness and functionality of the facility and other 10 requirements the authority deems necessary. Appointments to site super- 11 intendent or maintenance supervisor shall be made in accordance with 12 applicable provisions of the civil service law and only persons who have 13 never been convicted of a felony, and who are citizens of the United 14 States shall be appointed site superintendent or maintenance supervisor. 15 § 2. Subdivision (a) of section 27-2052 of the administrative code of 16 the city of New York is amended to read as follows: 17 (a) Janitorial services means: Cleaning and maintenance, including the 18 making of minor repairs, such as workable locks on doors; the furnishing 19 of heat and hot water, where supplied from a central source; the removal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05781-01-5 S. 4368 2 1 of garbage, refuse, ashes and wastes from the premises; and the removal 2 of snow, ice, dirt and other matter from the sidewalk and gutter. 3 § 3. Section 27-2053 of the administrative code of the city of New 4 York is amended by adding a new subdivision d to read as follows: 5 d. Janitors in city of New York housing authority facilities shall 6 take substantial actual or material steps towards remedying heating 7 issues and broken locks on doors within forty-eight hours of receiving 8 notice of such issue. 9 § 4. Section 27-2056 of the administrative code of the city of New 10 York is REPEALED. 11 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.